apertium-en-lt.lt.dix
    <pardef n="abejotoj/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oj</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oms</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omis</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>osna</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abiturien/tė__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tė</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tės</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tei</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tę</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėje</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tėn</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tės</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čių</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėms</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėmis</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėse</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tėsna</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tės</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <e lm="apyvarta"><i>apyvart</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baudžiava"><i>baudžiav</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="delegacija"><i>delegacij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekologija"><i>ekologij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fotografija"><i>fotografij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heraldika"><i>heraldik</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="joja"><i>joj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klasika"><i>klasik</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kreida"><i>kreid</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lupa"><i>lup</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modifikacija"><i>modifikacij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nėščia"><i>nėšči</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paskola"><i>paskol</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pornografija"><i>pornografij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puošyba"><i>puošyb</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samprata"><i>samprat</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skruzdėda"><i>skruzdėd</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sėjomaina"><i>sėjomain</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuštuma"><i>tuštum</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vibracija"><i>vibracij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žmona"><i>žmon</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dalelytė"><i>dalely</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gegutė"><i>gegu</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaimynystė"><i>kaimynys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kunigaikštytė"><i>kunigaikšty</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="našlaitė"><i>našlai</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prezidentė"><i>preziden</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="suirutė"><i>suiru</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voveraitė"><i>voverai</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antinomija"><i>antinomij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aspiracija"><i>aspiracij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atvaša"><i>atvaš</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barzdyla"><i>barzdyl</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cikorija"><i>cikorij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dendrologija"><i>dendrologij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="driska"><i>drisk</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektrotechnika"><i>elektrotechnik</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuksija"><i>fuksij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="giedra"><i>giedr</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guboja"><i>guboj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="indoeuropeistika"><i>indoeuropeistik</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iškala"><i>iškal</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jausena"><i>jausen</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karininkija"><i>karininkij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kiršintoja"><i>kiršintoj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konvekcija"><i>konvekcij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvakna"><i>kvakn</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liejyba"><i>liejyb</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="makulatūra"><i>makulatūr</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miežiena"><i>miežien</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mūša"><i>mūš</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nešvara"><i>nešvar</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="padilba"><i>padilb</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pašaipa"><i>pašaip</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plynuma"><i>plynum</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pumpa"><i>pump</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ripka"><i>ripk</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saviroda"><i>savirod</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smaila"><i>smail</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svetimautoja"><i>svetimautoj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trikdytoja"><i>trikdytoj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaizduosena"><i>vaizduosen</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vulgarizacija"><i>vulgarizacij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šašbauda"><i>šašbaud</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žiova"><i>žiov</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adresatė"><i>adresa</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akvanautė"><i>akvanau</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antramitė"><i>antrami</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arogantė"><i>arogan</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autokratė"><i>autokra</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baltkaktė"><i>baltkak</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bendratažtė"><i>bendrataž</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beviltė"><i>bevil</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="budistė"><i>budis</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="darbavietė"><i>darbavie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deistė"><i>deis</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diplomatė"><i>diploma</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvyndantė"><i>dvyndan</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="emigrantė"><i>emigran</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fašistė"><i>fašis</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gauruotė"><i>gauruo</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gražbylystė"><i>gražbylys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gvardietė"><i>gvardie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="impresionistė"><i>impresionis</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="išvietė"><i>išvie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jūrininkystė"><i>jūrininkys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaminkrėtė"><i>kaminkrė</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keliavietė"><i>keliavie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirvapentė"><i>kirvapen</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knygnešystė"><i>knygnešys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kraitė"><i>krai</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kursantė"><i>kursan</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laivininkystė"><i>laivininkys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lygutė"><i>lygu</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medutė"><i>medu</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mulatė"><i>mula</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nuleistpetė"><i>nuleistpe</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pakartė"><i>pakar</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasostė"><i>pasos</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pievininkystė"><i>pievininkys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potekstė"><i>poteks</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pusinteligentė"><i>pusinteligen</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="renegatė"><i>renega</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seniūnystė"><i>seniūnys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slaptavietė"><i>slaptavie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stilistė"><i>stilis</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tarškutė"><i>taršku</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udmurtė"><i>udmur</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valtornistė"><i>valtornis</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vienvietė"><i>vienvie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="įmotė"><i>įmo</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šluotrykštė"><i>šluotrykš</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žirgininkystė"><i>žirgininkys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
